Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1109
Proof of possession of gambling device; prima facie evidence.

Proof of possession of any gambling device shall be prima facie evidence of possession thereof with knowledge of its contents and character.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 225;

Laws 1979, LB 152, § 9.